Washington statutes.
RCW 26.28.060

Child labor—Penalty.

(1) Every person who shall employ, and every parent, guardian or other person having the care, custody or control of such child, who shall permit to be employed, by another, any child under the age of fourteen years at any labor whatever, in or in connection with any store, shop, factory, mine or any inside employment not connected with farm or house work, without the written permit thereto of a judge of a superior court of the county wherein such child may live, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to children employed as:

(a) Actors or performers in film, video, audio, or theatrical productions; or

(b) Youth soccer referees who have been certified by a national referee certification program.

[ 2007 c 464 s 1; 1994 c 62 s 1; 1973 1st ex.s. c 154 s 39; 1909 c 249 s 195; RRS s 2447.]

NOTES:

Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 154: See note following RCW 2.12.030.

Child labor: Chapter 49.12 RCW.

Employment permits: RCW 28A.225.080.